Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.4891

Part-time academic employees—State-mandated benefits—Reporting eligible employees.

For the purposes of determining eligibility for receipt of state-mandated benefits for part-time academic employees at community and technical colleges, each institution shall report to the appropriate agencies the names of eligible part-time academic employees who qualify for benefits based on calculating the hours worked by part-time academic employees as a percentage of the part-time academic workload to the full-time academic workload in a given discipline in a given institution.

[ 1996 c 120 s 2.]